Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,283
Splash aprons; requirements.

Every new motor vehicle or semitrailer purchased after January 1, 1956, and operated on any highway in this state shall be equipped with fenders, covers, or devices, including flaps or splash aprons, unless the body of the vehicle affords adequate protection to effectively minimize the spray or splash of water or mud to the rear of the motor vehicle or semitrailer.

Laws 1955, c. 160, § 1, p. 464;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-735.01;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,128;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 379.